Utah statutes.
79-4-801.   Provo-Jordan River Parkway Authority  transferred to Division of Parks and Recreation.

All properties, rights, interests, powers, functions, duties, and obligations of the Provo-Jordan River Parkway Authority are transferred to the division.

